Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.140

Disestablishment of area—Hearing—Resolution.

The legislative authority may disestablish an area by ordinance after a hearing before the legislative authority. The legislative authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the area at least fifteen days prior to the hearing required by this section. The resolution shall give the time and place of the hearing.

[ 2003 c 148 s 14.]